Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.160

Default judgment not evidence of assets—Exception.

When a judgment is given against a personal representative for want of answer, such judgment is not to be deemed evidence of assets in his or her hands, unless it appear that the complaint alleged assets and that the notice was served upon him or her.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2040; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.160. Prior: Code 1881 s 720; 1877 p 146 s 724; 1869 p 166 s 661; RRS s 969.]